Illinois, session 104th, HB1915.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, 5and Persons with Disabilities Act is amended by changing 6Section 5 as follows: 7    (30 ILCS 575/5)  (from Ch. 127, par. 132.605)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on June 30, 2029)9    Sec. 5. Business Enterprise Council. 10    (1) To help implement, monitor, and enforce the goals of 11this Act, there is created the Business Enterprise Council for 12Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities, hereinafter 13referred to as the Council, composed of the Chairperson of the 14Commission on Equity and Inclusion, the Secretary of Human 15Services and the Directors of the Department of Human Rights, 16the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, the 17Department of Central Management Services, the Department of 18Transportation and the Capital Development Board, or their 19duly appointed representatives, with the Comptroller, or his 20or her designee, serving as an advisory member of the Council. 21Ten individuals representing businesses that are 22minority-owned, women-owned, or owned by persons with 23disabilities, 2 individuals representing the business   HB1915- 2 -LRB104 09213 HLH 20430 b1community, and a representative of public institutions of 2higher education shall be appointed by the Governor. These 3members shall serve 2-year terms and shall be eligible for 4reappointment. Any vacancy occurring on the Council shall also 5be filled by the Governor. Any member appointed to fill a 6vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for 7which his or her predecessor was appointed shall be appointed 8for the remainder of such term. Members of the Council shall 9serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for any 10ordinary and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of 11their duties. 12    The Chairperson of the Commission shall serve as the 13Council chairperson and shall select, subject to approval of 14the Council, a Secretary responsible for the operation of the 15program who shall serve as the Division Manager of the 16Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 17Disabilities Division of the Commission on Equity and 18Inclusion.19    The Director of each State agency and the chief executive 20officer of each public institution of higher education shall 21appoint a liaison to the Council. The liaison shall be 22responsible for submitting to the Council any reports and 23documents necessary under this Act.24    (2) The Council's authority and responsibility shall be 25to:26        (a) Devise a certification procedure to assure that   HB1915- 3 -LRB104 09213 HLH 20430 b1    businesses taking advantage of this Act are legitimately 2    classified as businesses owned by minorities, women, or 3    persons with disabilities and a registration procedure to 4    recognize, without additional evidence of Business 5    Enterprise Program eligibility, the certification of 6    businesses owned by minorities, women, or persons with 7    disabilities certified by the Secretary of State, the City 8    of Chicago, Cook County, or other jurisdictional programs 9    with requirements and procedures equaling or exceeding 10    those in this Act.11        (b) Maintain a list of all businesses legitimately 12    classified as businesses owned by minorities, women, or 13    persons with disabilities to provide to State agencies and 14    public institutions of higher education.15        (c) Review rules and regulations for the 16    implementation of the program for businesses owned by 17    minorities, women, and persons with disabilities.18        (d) Review compliance plans submitted by each State 19    agency and public institution of higher education pursuant 20    to this Act.21        (e) Make annual reports as provided in Section 8f to 22    the Governor and the General Assembly on the status of the 23    program.24        (f) Serve as a central clearinghouse for information 25    on State contracts, including the maintenance of a list of 26    all pending State contracts upon which businesses owned by   HB1915- 4 -LRB104 09213 HLH 20430 b1    minorities, women, and persons with disabilities may bid. 2    At the Council's discretion, maintenance of the list may 3    include 24-hour electronic access to the list along with 4    the bid and application information.5        (g) Establish a toll-free telephone number to 6    facilitate information requests concerning the 7    certification process and pending contracts.8        (h) Adopt a procedure to grant automatic certification 9    to businesses holding a certification from at least one of 10    the following entities: (i) the Illinois Unified 11    Certification Program; (ii) the Women's Business 12    Development Center in Chicago; (iii) the Chicago Minority 13    Supplier Development Council; (iv) a Small Business 14    Development Center; or (v) (iv) any other similar entity 15    offering such certification to businesses.16        (i) Develop and maintain a repository for 17    non-certified vendors that: (i) have applied for 18    certification and have been denied; (ii) have started, but 19    not completed, the certification process; (iii) have 20    achieved certification, but did not seek renewal; or (iv) 21    are known businesses owned by minorities, women, or 22    persons with disabilities.23    (3) No premium bond rate of a surety company for a bond 24required of a business owned by a minority, woman, or person 25with a disability bidding for a State contract shall be higher 26than the lowest rate charged by that surety company for a   HB1915- 5 -LRB104 09213 HLH 20430 b1similar bond in the same classification of work that would be 2written for a business not owned by a minority, woman, or 3person with a disability.4    (4) Any Council member who has direct financial or 5personal interest in any measure pending before the Council 6shall disclose this fact to the Council and refrain from 7participating in the determination upon such measure.8    (5) The Secretary shall have the following duties and 9responsibilities:10        (a) To be responsible for the day-to-day operation of 11    the Council.12        (b) To serve as a coordinator for all of the State's 13    programs for businesses owned by minorities, women, and 14    persons with disabilities and as the information and 15    referral center for all State initiatives for businesses 16    owned by minorities, women, and persons with disabilities.17        (c) To establish an enforcement procedure whereby the 18    Council may recommend to the appropriate State legal 19    officer that the State exercise its legal remedies which 20    shall include (1) termination of the contract involved, 21    (2) prohibition of participation by the respondent in 22    State contracts for a period not to exceed 3 years, (3) 23    imposition of a penalty not to exceed any profit acquired 24    as a result of violation, or (4) any combination thereof. 25    Such procedures shall require prior approval by Council. 26    All funds collected as penalties under this subsection   HB1915- 6 -LRB104 09213 HLH 20430 b1    shall be used exclusively for maintenance and further 2    development of the Business Enterprise Program and 3    encouragement of participation in State procurement by 4    minorities, women, and persons with disabilities. 5        (d) To devise appropriate policies, regulations, and 6    procedures for including participation by businesses owned 7    by minorities, women, and persons with disabilities as 8    prime contractors, including, but not limited to: (i) 9    encouraging the inclusions of qualified businesses owned 10    by minorities, women, and persons with disabilities on 11    solicitation lists, (ii) investigating the potential of 12    blanket bonding programs for small construction jobs, and 13    (iii) investigating and making recommendations concerning 14    the use of the sheltered market process.15        (e) To devise procedures for the waiver of the 16    participation goals in appropriate circumstances.17        (f) To accept donations and, with the approval of the 18    Council or the Chairperson of the Commission on Equity and 19    Inclusion, grants related to the purposes of this Act; to 20    conduct seminars related to the purpose of this Act and to 21    charge reasonable registration fees; and to sell 22    directories, vendor lists, and other such information to 23    interested parties, except that forms necessary to become 24    eligible for the program shall be provided free of charge 25    to a business or individual applying for the Business 26    Enterprise Program.  HB1915- 7 -LRB104 09213 HLH 20430 b1(Source: P.A. 102-29, eff. 6-25-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 2102-721, eff. 1-1-23; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25.)